Hawaii statutes.
§190-1 Conservation area; administration.
All marine waters of the State are hereby constituted a marine life
conservation area to be administered by the department of land and natural
resources subject to this chapter and any other applicable laws not inconsistent
herewith or with any rules adopted pursuant hereto. No person shall fish for
or take any fish, crustacean, mollusk, live coral, algae or other marine life,
or take or alter any rock, coral, sand or other geological feature within any
conservation district established pursuant to this chapter except in accordance
with section 190-4 and rules adopted by the department pursuant hereto. [L
1955, c 192, §2; RL 1955, §21-131; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132,
§2; HRS §190-1; am L 1981, c 16, §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Protecting Hawai‘i's
Fisheries: Creating an Effective Regulatory Scheme to Sustain Hawai‘i's Fish
Stocks. 29 UH L. Rev. 243.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next